Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 4 Attendance and Leave
21-4-204. Annual leave — Accrual and use.

Except for the employees under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, each permanent or probationary employee shall be entitled to annual leave with full pay computed on the basis of the following schedule for each complete month of service including the probationary period:

Each fire and emergency service employee of the Department of the Military who works a regularly scheduled shift of more than forty-seven (47) hours per week is entitled to annual leave with full pay computed on the basis of the following schedule for each complete month of service:

Annual leave with pay shall be allowed to provisional and temporary employees on the basis of one (1) working day for each complete month of service.

Annual leave with pay shall be allowed to permanent, probationary, provisional, and temporary employees who are working one-half (½) time computed on the basis of one-half (½) the rate of the schedule for full-time employees for each complete month of service.

Annual leave with pay shall not be granted to emergency, hourly, intermittent, or per diem employees.

Annual leave shall be cumulative. No employee shall have more than thirty (30) days of annual leave accumulated at the end of each calendar year. However, the thirty-day accumulative annual leave may exceed thirty (30) days prior to the end of the calendar year.

No fire or emergency service employee under subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall accumulate annual leave in excess of forty-five (45) days at the end of each calendar year, except that the forty-five-day maximum of cumulative annual leave may exceed forty-five (45) days during the calendar year.

Accumulated annual leave shall be granted by the agency director at such time or times as will least interfere with the efficient operation of the agency.

Employees transferring between state agencies without a break in service shall retain, at the time of transfer, all accumulated annual leave credits.

Change of positions in the annual leave schedule shall be determined on the basis of completed years of service. Seniority for reinstated employees will be brought forward in completed years of service only.

Accrual rates will change on the first day of the month following eligibility for the next higher accrual rate.

Annual leave may not be accumulated during a period of leave without pay when such leave is for ten (10) or more days within a calendar month.

Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and nonworking days within a period of annual leave shall not be charged as annual leave. Annual leave granted shall be based on working days.

Unearned annual leave shall not be loaned.

The minimum charge for absence on account of annual leave shall be fifteen (15) minutes.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment added (a)(2); in present (a)(1), added “Except for the employees under subdivision (a)(2) of this section” at the beginning and made stylistic changes; added (e)(1)(B); and inserted “of” preceding “annual leave” in (e)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of the Military” for “State Military Department” in the introductory language of (a)(2).

No payment shall be made in any case until it shall have been determined that the deceased was not indebted to the agency.

A voucher shall be prepared for the money due to be made payable either to the estate of the deceased or to an individual authorized to receive such payment.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The term “immediate family member” is defined for the subchapter in §21-4-203.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment added the subdivision designations in (b); and, in present (b)(2), substituted “means” for “shall mean” and inserted “grandchild.”

Each fire and emergency service employee of the Department of the Military who works a regularly scheduled shift of more than forty-seven (47) hours per week is entitled to sick leave with full pay computed on the basis of one (1) day and four (4) hours for each complete month of service.

(A)Only one hundred twenty (120) days of sick leave may be carried over at the end of the calendar year.

Fire and emergency service employees under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section may accumulate one hundred eighty (180) days of sick leave to carry over at the end of the calendar year.

Payment to a fire and emergency service employee for unused sick leave at retirement under § 21-4-501 et seq. shall be calculated at the one-hundred-eighty-day maximum rate for a fire and emergency service employee.

An agency that has a written procedure to identify patterns of sick leave usage may require an employee to furnish a certificate from an attending physician for any use of sick leave.

A certificate from a Christian Science practitioner listed in The Christian Science Journal may be submitted in lieu of a physician's certificate.

Sick leave with pay shall not be granted to emergency, hourly, intermittent, or per diem employees.

Sick leave with pay shall be allowed to provisional and temporary employees on the basis of one (1) day for each complete month of service.

Sick leave with pay shall be allowed to permanent, probationary, provisional, and temporary employees who are working one-half (½) time computed on the basis of one-half (½) the rate of the schedule for full-time employees for each complete month of service.

(1)Sick leave may not be accumulated during a period of leave without pay when such leave is for ten (10) or more days within a calendar month.

(1)Except in the case of maternity leave, absences due to sick leave shall be charged in the following order:

Earned sick leave;

Earned annual leave;

Shared leave, when authorized;

Catastrophic leave, when authorized; and

Leave without pay, when authorized.

(A)Requests for sick leave shall be applied for in advance.

If the nature of the sickness makes this impossible, notification of absence on account of sickness shall be given as soon as possible on the first day of absence to the head of the department or the person in charge of the office, and application for sick leave shall be filed within two (2) days after return to duty.

If notification is not made in accordance with the procedure in this section, the absence shall be charged to annual leave or leave without pay, at the discretion of the agency director.

The minimum charge for absence on account of sickness shall be fifteen (15) minutes.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment by No. 356 redesignated the former introductory language of (a), (a)(1) and (2) as present (a)(1)(A), (2)(A) and (3), respectively; added the exception at the beginning of (a)(1)(A); added (a)(1)(B) and (a)(2)(B); and added the subdivision designations in present (a)(3).

The 2003 amendment by No. 835 substituted “ten (10) or more days” for “more than ten (10) days” in (e)(1).

The 2013 amendment inserted (f)(1)(C) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of the Military” for “State Military Department” in (a)(1)(B).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (b).

(1)Employees who are absent from work due to a temporary occupational injury or illness and who are entitled to workers' compensation benefits, upon proper application, may utilize their accrued sick leave as a supplement to their workers' compensation benefits so as to receive benefits from both sources equal to but not in excess of their normal weekly pay at the time of their injury or onset of illness.

(1)In the event an employee receives workers' compensation payments as a salary benefit in addition to sick leave payments and the combined payments exceed the employee's normal weekly pay, the employee shall pay the excess amount to the agency for deposit into the agency's fund from which the sick leave has been paid.

Maternity leave shall be treated as any other leave for sickness or disability. Accumulated sick leave and annual leave, if requested by the employee, shall be granted for maternity use, after which leave without pay may be used.

Catastrophic leave under § 21-4-214 may be used for maternity leave.

(1)Upon application in writing to and written approval by the agency director, a state employee may be eligible to obtain a continuous leave of absence without pay up to six (6) months unless:

Granted in accordance with § 21-4-212; or

The agency director has determined that the state employee's request for leave of absence without pay would cause an undue hardship on the agency.

At the expiration of such leave, the employee shall be reinstated in the service without loss of any of his or her benefits or shall extend the leave of absence without pay up to an additional six (6) months unless:

The agency director has determined that reinstatement or continuing the leave without pay status of the state employee would cause an undue hardship on the agency; or

The position is no longer available due to a budgetary reduction in staff of the agency.

Failure on the part of an employee to report promptly at the expiration of the leave of absence except for satisfactory reasons submitted in advance shall be a cause for dismissal.

(1)(A)Except in accordance with § 21-4-212 and in the case of maternity leave, leave of absence without pay shall not be granted until all of the employee's accumulated annual leave has been exhausted.

However, an agency may place an employee in a leave-without-pay status:

For disciplinary reasons in accordance with the agency's written and publicized personnel policy;

Due to inclement weather as designated by state policy; or

Due to necessary budget reduction as determined by the state agency director.

(1)Any employee on leave of absence without pay shall not accumulate leave time, participate in agency group insurance programs to which the state contributes, or receive pay for any legal holidays.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment rewrote (a); added the subdivision designations in (c) and made stylistic changes; and added (c)(1)(B)(ii) and (iii).

Through 3 years
1 day per month 3 through 5 years
1 day and 2 hours per month 5 through 12 years
1 day and 4 hours per month 12 through 20 years
1 day and 6 hours per month Over 20 years
1 day and 7 hours per month

Click to view form.

Through 3 years
1 day and 4 hours per month 3 through 5 years
1 day and 7 hours per month 5 through 12 years
2 days per month 12 through 20 years
2 days and 3 hours per month Over 20 years
2 days and 5 hours per month

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2367; Acts 1997, No. 155, § 1; 2003, No. 356, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5546.

21-4-205. Annual leave — Unused leave.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, whenever an employee is separated from the agency by reason of resignation, layoff, termination of appointment, or dismissal, the unused annual leave to his or her credit as of his or her last duty date shall be liquidated by a lump-sum payment, not to exceed thirty (30) working days, inclusive of holidays.

Unused annual leave to the credit of a fire and emergency service employee under §21-4-204(a)(2) shall be liquidated by a lump-sum payment, not to exceed forty-five (45) working days, inclusive of holidays.

(1)Unused accumulated annual leave of a deceased employee, not to exceed thirty (30) days, shall be payable either to the estate of the deceased or to an individual authorized to receive such payment.

Payment for services of an employee on leave with pay status at the time of death shall continue through close of business on the day of demise.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2367; Acts 2007, No. 606, § 1.

21-4-206. Sick leave — When granted — Definition.

(1)Sick leave with pay shall be granted to employees when they are incapacitated for the performance of their duties by sickness, injury, or for medical, dental, or optical treatment.

Sick leave may not be granted for slight illness or indisposition not incapacitating the employee for the performance of his or her regular duties.

(1)Sick leave may also be granted employees due to a death or serious illness of a member of the employee's immediate family.

For the purposes of this subsection, “immediate family” means the father, mother, sister, brother, husband, wife, child, grandmother, grandfather, grandchild, in-laws, or any individual acting as parent or guardian of an employee.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2368; Acts 2003, No. 835, § 1.

21-4-207. Sick leave — Accrual and use.

(1)(A)Except for the employees under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, each permanent or probationary employee shall be entitled to sick leave with full pay computed on the basis of one (1) day for each complete month of service including the probationary period.

(A)(i)An employee shall be required to furnish a certificate from an attending physician for five (5) or more consecutive days of sick leave.

Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and nonworking days within a period of sick leave shall not be charged as sick leave. Sick leave granted shall be based on working days.

Employees transferring between state agencies without a break in service shall, at the time of transfer, retain all accumulated sick leave credits.

Whenever an employee is laid off because of budgetary reasons or curtailment of activities and he or she is reinstated within a period of six (6) months, accumulated sick leave may be restored to his or her credit.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 5; 1983, No. 129, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2368; Acts 1989, No. 265, § 1; 1991, No. 91, § 3; 1991, No. 169, § 3; 1997, No. 155, § 2; 2003, No. 356, § 3; 2003, No. 835, § 2; 2007, No. 606, § 2; 2013, No. 997, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5547.

21-4-208. Sick leave — Use in conjunction with workers' compensation.

Such option, when exercised, shall reduce the employee's accrued sick leave on a proportional basis.

Upon receipt of the excess amount of pay, the agency shall then restore to the employee's credit that amount of sick leave that was used in a proportion that the workers' compensation payment is to the employee's weekly pay.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 5; 1977, No. 664, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2368.

21-4-209. Maternity leave.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2368; Acts 2017, No. 182, §
3.

21-4-210. Leave of absence without pay.

Leave of absence without pay due to illness shall not be granted until all of the employee's accumulated sick leave has been exhausted.

In the case of maternity leave, the employee may elect to take leave of absence without pay without exhausting accumulated annual and sick leave.

Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an employee from paying the total costs of agency group insurance during such leave and being reinstated into such programs on return to duty.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 6; 1983, No. 129, § 2; 1983, No. 931, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2369; Acts 2003, No. 835, § 3.

21-4-211. Educational leave.

A permanent employee who is given out-service training may be granted educational leave by the agency director on the following basis:

The employee will continue in the service of the agency for a period of time as statutorily required or, in the absence of a specific law, at least two (2) times the length of his or her course of training;

Any employee who does not fulfill these obligations shall be required to pay to the agency the total cost, or a proportionate share of the cost, of the out-service training and compensation paid during the training period.

A written contract shall be signed by the employee and the agency setting forth all terms of the agreement;

The employee shall retain all rights in the position held at the time when leave was granted or in a position with comparable security and pay;

The employee shall retain all benefits and rights during the training period that accrued during that time to regular employees;

The amount of salary paid during the training period shall be as agreed by the employee and agency director but shall not exceed the regular salary paid the employee; and

Payment of tuition, fees, books, and transportation may be made if moneys have been specifically appropriated by the General Assembly for those purposes or if the Department of Health provides assistance to employees of the department who are seeking a master's degree, a doctor of public health degree, or a doctor of philosophy degree in public health.

The department shall not provide the assistance authorized under subdivision (6)(A) of this section to more than twelve (12) employees in any fiscal year.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment made minor stylistic changes in (5); in (6)(A), substituted “department” for “Division of Health of the Department of Health,” substituted “a doctor of public health” for “DrPH” and substituted “a doctor of philosophy degree” for “PhD degree.”

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2372; Acts 1999, No. 193, § 1; 2007, No. 280, § 1; 2009, No. 252, § 1.

21-4-212. Military leave — Definition.

Employees who are members of the armed forces of this state or any other state, including without limitation the National Guard or a reserve component or auxiliary of the United States Armed Forces, shall be granted leave at the rate of fifteen (15) days per calendar year plus necessary travel time for annual training requirements or other duties performed in an official duty status.

To the extent this leave is not used in a calendar year, it will accumulate for use in the succeeding calendar year until it totals fifteen (15) days at the beginning of a calendar year.

The leave shall be granted without loss of pay and in addition to regular vacation time.

Each employee who requests military leave shall furnish a copy of his or her orders for his or her personnel file.

An employee who is drafted or called to active duty in the United States Armed Forces or who volunteers for military service shall be placed on extended military leave without pay and upon application within ninety (90) days after the effective date of his or her release from active duty shall be reinstated to the position vacated or an equivalent position at no loss of seniority or any of the other benefits and privileges of employment.

The right of reemployment shall conform with all federal government rules and regulations.

Personnel called to duty in emergency situations by the Governor or the President of the United States shall be granted leave with pay not to exceed thirty (30) working days after which leave without pay will be granted. This leave shall be granted in addition to regular vacation time.

As used in this section, “emergency situations” means:

Any case of invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, breach of peace, or imminent danger thereof;

Threats to the public health or security; or

Threats to the maintenance of law and order.

During any military leave of absence, the employee shall preserve all seniority rights, efficiency or performance ratings, promotional status, retirement privileges, life and disability insurance benefits, and any other rights, privileges, and benefits to which the employee has become entitled.

For purposes of computations to determine whether the person may be entitled to retirement benefits, the period of military service shall be deemed continuous service, and the employee shall not be required to make any contributions to any retirement fund.

The state shall continue to contribute its portion of any life or disability insurance premiums during the leave of absence on behalf of the employee, if requested, so that continuous coverage may be maintained.

Whenever an employee as defined under § 21-4-203 or an employee of a political subdivision is granted military leave for a period of fifteen (15) days per calendar year or fiscal year under this section, the military leave shall accumulate for use in succeeding calendar years or fiscal years until it totals fifteen (15) days at the beginning of the calendar year or fiscal year, for a maximum number of thirty (30) military leave days available in any one (1) calendar year or fiscal year.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1991, No. 956, § 1, is also codified as §§6-17-306(f) and21-4-102(e).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote (a)(1); deleted former (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and inserted “As used in this section” in the introductory language of present (c)(2).

The 2017 amendment inserted “or auxiliary” in (a)(1).

Entitled to his or her salary if the employee is a witness in a matter:

Within the employee's scope of state employment; or

Outside the employee's scope of state employment and the employee is not serving as a paid expert witness or is not a party to the matter; and

Required to take annual leave to attend the deposition, hearing, or appear in court only if the matter is outside of the employee's scope of state employment and the employee is serving as a paid expert witness or is a party to the matter.

This section shall not apply; and

The law enforcement officer shall be entitled to retain witness and mileage fees tendered to the law enforcement officer.

As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” means any public servant vested by law with a duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for offenses.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment substituted “a juror or subpoenaed as a witness … scope of state employment” for “a witness or juror or party litigant.”

The 2005 amendment added (b) and (c); and, in (a), substituted “An” for “Any,” deleted “or subpoenaed as a witness to give a deposition in a court or hearing not involving personal litigation or service as a paid expert witness outside the scope of state employment,” following “a juror,” and inserted “in state or federal court.”

(1)The Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall have administrative responsibility for developing, implementing, and maintaining the statewide catastrophic leave bank program.

The following governmental entities may voluntarily participate in the catastrophic leave bank program or establish a catastrophic leave bank for its employees:

The General Assembly;

The Bureau of Legislative Research;

Arkansas Legislative Audit;

The Arkansas Department of Transportation;

The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;

The Supreme Court;

The Court of Appeals;

The Administrative Office of the Courts;

A constitutional office; and

Institutions of higher education.

Accrued annual leave and sick leave of employees may be donated to a catastrophic leave bank.

Catastrophic leave with pay may be granted to an employee when the employee is unable to perform his or her duties due to a catastrophic illness, including maternity purposes.

An employee may be eligible for catastrophic leave when:

A person who was employed by a public school district or state-supported institution of higher education for less than one (1) year also is eligible for catastrophic leave if:

The person's combined years of employment with the state and with a public school district or state-supported institution of higher education totals more than one (1) year; and

The lapse in the person's employment between the state and a public school district or state-supported institution of higher education is less than six (6) months;

The birth of the employee's biological child; or

The placement of an adoptive child in the home of the employee;

At the onset of the illness or injury the employee had to his or her credit at least eighty (80) hours of combined sick and annual leave and has exhausted all such leave, unless the combined sick and annual leave requirement is waived under subdivision (d)(3)(B) of this section.

A state agency director or a president of an institution of higher education may waive the minimum eighty-hour requirement for combined sick and annual leave if the agency director determines that the employee warrants eligibility because of extraordinary circumstances under the standards and guidelines promulgated under subdivision (g)(2) of this section;

An employee on catastrophic leave for maternity purposes is not required to exhaust sick or annual leave before being granted catastrophic leave.

An employee on catastrophic leave for maternity purposes does not accrue any leave;

An acceptable medical certificate from a physician supporting the continued absence is on file; and

The employee has not been disciplined for any leave abuse during the past year from the time of application.

If the illness or injury is that of an employee and is covered by workers' compensation, the compensation based on catastrophic leave when combined with the weekly workers' compensation benefit received by the employee shall not exceed the compensation being received by the employee at the onset of the illness or injury.

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, or the secretary's designee, shall establish policies and procedures:

As deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this section; and

To prescribe the standards and guidelines of the extraordinary circumstances that the state agency director or the president of an institution of higher education may use to waive the minimum requirement for combined sick and annual leave.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The introductory language of subsection (g) was amended by Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 3495 and 6124. The amendments cannot be reconciled.Under rules of statutory construction, Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6124, being the later section, has the effect of repealing Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3495.Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3495, amended the introductory language of (g) to read as follows: “(g) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, or the secretary's designee, shall establish policies and procedures:”

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “when such employee is unable to perform his or her duties” for “when such employee is incapacitated for the performance of the employee's duties” in (c); rewrote (d)(2); deleted former (d)(3); redesignated former (d)(4) and (d)(5) as present (d)(3) and (d)(4); added (e); redesignated former (e) as present (f); and made stylistic changes.

The 2003 amendment redesignated former (d)(2) as present (d)(2)(A) and added “unless the combined … this section”; added (d)(2)(B); added (f)(2); and made stylistic and gender neutral changes in (f).

The 2009 amendment rewrote (d)(1).

The 2017 amendment substituted “the statewide” for “a” in (a)(1); substituted “shall” for “approved by the department to participate in the catastrophic leave bank program may establish a catastrophic leave bank for its employees, or the state agency may” in (a)(2)(A); added (a)(2)(B); added “including maternity purposes” to the end of (c); substituted “one (1) year” for “two (2) years” in (d)(1)(A), the introductory language of (d)(1)(B), and (d)(1)(B)(i); inserted present (d)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; added (d)(3)(C); substituted “year from the time of application” for “two (2) years” in (d)(5); inserted present (e) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “establish policies and procedures” for “promulgate rules and regulations” in (g); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 390, in (d)(1)(A), substituted the first occurrence of “one (1) year or more” for “more than (1) year” and substituted the second occurrence of “one (1) year or more” for “more than two (2) years”; and substituted “The employee is female, and the catastrophic leave is to be used for maternity purposes” for “Catastrophic leave for maternity purposes may be granted to a female employee” in the introductory language of (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, § 3495, in the introductory language of (g), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” and “secretary’s” for “director’s”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, §§6123, 6124, substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(1); and, in the introductory language of (g), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” and “secretary’s” for “director’s”.

U.S. Code. The Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, Pub. L. No. 103-3, referred to in this section, is primarily codified as 29 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq. and 5 U.S.C. § 6381 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Public Officers and Employees, Catastrophic Leave Program, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 474.

“Organ donor” means a person from whose body an organ is taken to be transferred to the body of another person;

“Public school” means any public school or education service cooperative located in the State of Arkansas;

“Public school employee” means a full-time employee of a public school or education service cooperative;

“State agency” means an agency, bureau, board, or commission of any branch of state government, and all state-supported institutions of higher education; and

“State employee” means a full-time employee of the State of Arkansas or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, or state-supported institution of higher education.

Cross References. Organ and tissue donation education in driver's instruction manual, §27-18-109.

Organ donor awareness education, §6-16-501.

“Child” includes a person who meets the criteria of subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section but is over eighteen (18) years of age and:

Has a developmental disability as defined in § 20-48-101; or

Is declared legally incompetent;

“Educational activity” includes without limitation:

Attending a parent-teacher conference;

Participating in school-sponsored tutoring of the child;

Participating in a volunteer program sponsored by the school in which the child is enrolled;

Attending a field trip with the child;

Attending a school-sponsored program or ceremony in which the child is participating;

Attending a graduation or homecoming ceremony in which the child is participating;

Attending an awards or scholarship presentation in which the child is participating;

Attending a parents' or grandparents' breakfast in which the child is participating;

Attending a classroom party in which the child is participating;

Attending a school committee meeting of the school in which the child is enrolled;

Attending an academic competition in which the child is participating;

Attending an athletic, music, or theater program in which the child is enrolled; and

Engaging in any of the activities listed in subdivisions (a)(2)(B)(i)-(xii) of this section that are connected with a prekindergarten program;

(1)All state employees shall be entitled to eight (8) hours of leave during any one (1) calendar year for the purpose of engaging in and traveling to or from the educational activities of a child.

That is unused may not be carried over to the next calendar year; and

Is not compensable to the state employee at the time of retirement.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 1028, § 1, provided:

“Legislative intent. The purpose of this act is to allow state employees an opportunity to participate in their children's educational activities by granting eight (8) hours of children's educational activity leave per calendar year.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment redesignated former (a)(1)(A) through (G) as (a)(1)(A)(i) through (vii); inserted “an educational program for” in (a)(1)(A); and added (a)(1)(B), (a)(2)(B)(ix), and (a)(3).

The 2013 amendment, in (a)(1)(B), added “over eighteen (18) years of age and,” rewrote (a)(1)(B)(i) and added “Is” preceding “declared” in (a)(1)(B)(ii).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(2); and substituted “engaging in and traveling to or from” for “attending or assisting with” in (b)(1).

A.C.R.C. Notes. The repeal of this section by Acts 2017, No. 182, §5, supersedes the amendment of this section by Acts 2017, No. 707, §68. The 2017 amendment by Act 707 changed “Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department” to “Arkansas Department of Transportation” in (b)(1)(E).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning shared leave, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 182, §5. The section was derived from Acts 2013, No. 997, § 3; 2015, No. 389, § 2.

Cross References. Rights of reservists, §21-3-306.

Effective Dates. Acts 1943, No. 247, §§ 17, 20: effective as of date of entry of affected official or employee into military service after Nov. 11, 1940. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas considerable confusion has been caused by the induction of state, county, and municipal officials and employees, into the armed forces of the United States, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.” Approved March 18, 1943.

Acts 1955, No. 72, § 2: approved Feb. 17, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas the Federal Selective Service Act has been amended to provide the above four-year limitation on re-employment rights, and, whereas there exists considerable confusion regarding the status of public employees in military service, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2370; Acts 1989, No. 586, § 1; 1991, No. 673, § 3; 1991, No. 956, § 1; 2011, No. 1164, § 3; 2017, No. 529, § 2.

21-4-213. Court and jury leave — Definition.

An employee serving as a juror in state or federal court shall be entitled to full compensation in addition to any fees paid for such services, and such services or necessary appearances in any court shall not be counted as annual leave.

If an employee is subpoenaed as a witness to give a deposition or testimony in state or federal court, at a hearing, or before any body with power to issue a subpoena, the employee is:

(1)If a law enforcement officer is subpoenaed to appear at a time when the law enforcement officer is not scheduled for regular duty:

History.

Acts 1975, No. 567, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2371; Acts 2003, No. 835, § 4; 2005, No. 1845, § 3.

21-4-214. Catastrophic leave program.

(A)Each state agency shall participate in a catastrophic leave bank to be administered by the Office of Personnel Management.

(A)The employee has been employed by the state for one (1) year or more or was previously employed by a public school district or state-supported institution of higher education for one (1) year or more.

The employee is female, and the catastrophic leave is to be used for maternity purposes after:

(1)Up to four (4) consecutive weeks of catastrophic leave with full pay may be granted to an employee for maternity purposes.

The employee shall be eligible for the leave only within the first twelve (12) weeks after the birth or adoption of a child.

After the expiration of the four (4) weeks of leave under subdivision (e)(1) of this section, maternity leave shall be treated as any other leave for sickness or disability under §21-4-209.

Catastrophic leave for maternity purposes shall run concurrently with the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, Pub. L. No. 103-3.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 91, § 2; 1991, No. 169, § 2; 1999, No. 1176, § 4; 2003, No. 194, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 870, § 1; 2017, No. 182, §
4; 2019, No. 390, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3495, 6123, 6124.

21-4-215. Leave for bone marrow or organ donation — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Bone marrow donor” means a person from whose body bone marrow is taken to be transferred to the body of another person;

“Organ” means a human organ that is capable of being transferred from the body of a person to the body of another person, including eyes;

In any calendar year, a state employee or public school employee is entitled to the following leave in order to serve as an organ donor or a bone marrow donor:

No more than seven (7) days of leave to serve as a bone marrow donor; and

No more than thirty (30) days of leave to serve as an organ donor.

In order to qualify for the leave, the state employee or public school employee must:

Request the leave in writing;

Provide the employing agency written verification by the physician to perform the transplantation that the employee is to serve as a human organ or bone marrow donor; and

Provide the employing agency written verification by the physician performing the transplantation that the employee did serve as a human organ or bone marrow donor.

A state employee or school employee may use the leave as provided in this section without loss or reduction in pay, leave, or credit for time of service.

A state agency or public school shall not penalize an employee for requesting or obtaining leave pursuant to this section.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 546, § 3; 2007, No. 617, § 41.

21-4-216. Leave for participation in children's educational activities — Definitions.

As used in this section:

(A)“Child” means a person enrolled in an educational program for prekindergarten through grade twelve (preK-12) who is of the following relation to a state employee:

Natural child;

Adopted child;

Stepchild;

Foster child;

Grandchild;

Ward of the state employee by virtue of the state employee's having been appointed the person's legal guardian or custodian; or

Any other legal capacity in which the employee is acting as a parent for the child.

(A)“Educational activity” means any school-sponsored activity.

“Prekindergarten” means an educational and child development program that is designed to prepare children who are at least three (3) years of age for an academic kindergarten program;

“State agency” means an agency, a bureau, a board, or a commission of any branch of state government and all state-supported institutions of higher education; and

“State employee” means a full-time employee of the State of Arkansas or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, or state-supported institution of higher education.

Leave under subdivision (b)(1) of this section:

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1028, § 2; 2011, No. 584, §§ 1, 2; 2013, No. 134, § 1; 2015, No. 294, §§ 1, 2.

21-4-217. [Repealed.]

21-4-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Active service” or “active duty” shall include the period during which a person in military service is absent from duty on account of sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause;

“Military service” shall signify federal service on active duty with any branch of service referred to in subdivision (4) of this section as well as training or education under the supervision of the United States preliminary to induction into the military service;

“Period of military service” shall include the time between the following dates:

For persons in active service as of March 18, 1943, it shall begin with the date of their induction into active service; and

For persons entering active service, it shall begin with the date of their induction into active service.

It shall terminate with death or a date thirty (30) days immediately next succeeding the date of release or discharge from active military service, or upon return from active military service, whichever shall occur first; and

“Person in military service” and “persons in the military service of the United States” shall include the following persons and no others:

All members of the United States Army, United States Navy, United States Marine Corps, and United States Coast Guard; and

All officers of the United States Public Health Service detailed by proper authority for duty with either the United States Army or the United States Navy.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 247, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2301.